Missouri, session 2026, HB2616.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.177, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 143.177, to read as follows:
143.177. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri Working
Family Tax Credit Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of revenue;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a resident individual with a filing status of single, head of
household, widowed, or married filing combined who is subject to the tax imposed under this
chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265, and who is
allowed a federal earned income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Section 32, as amended;
(3) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under this chapter, excluding
withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
3. (1) Beginning with the 2023 calendar year, an eligible taxpayer shall be allowed a
tax credit in an amount equal to a percentage of the amount such taxpayer would receive
under the federal earned income tax credit as such credit existed under 26 U.S.C. Section 32
as of January 1, 2021, as provided pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection. The tax
credit allowed by this section shall be claimed by such taxpayer at the time such taxpayer files
a return and shall be applied against the income tax liability imposed by this chapter after
reduction for all other credits allowed thereon. For all tax years beginning on or before
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2616 2
December 31, 2026, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability, the difference shall
not be refunded to the taxpayer and shall not be carried forward to any subsequent tax year,
but for all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, tax credits issued under the
provisions of this section shall be refundable.
(2) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection, the percentage of
the federal earned income tax credit to be allowed as a tax credit pursuant to subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall be ten percent, which may be increased to twenty percent subject to
the provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection. The maximum percentage that may be
claimed as a tax credit pursuant to this section shall be twenty percent of the federal earned
income tax credit that may be claimed by such taxpayer. Any increase in the percentage that
may be claimed as a tax credit shall take effect on January first of a calendar year and such
percentage shall continue in effect until the next percentage increase occurs. An increase
shall only apply to tax years that begin on or after the increase takes effect.
(3) The initial percentage to be claimed as a tax credit and any increase in the
percentage that may be claimed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection shall only occur
if the amount of net general revenue collected in the previous fiscal year exceeds the highest
amount of net general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to such fiscal
year by at least one hundred fifty million dollars.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to the contrary, the department
shall determine whether any taxpayer filing a report or return with the department who did not
apply for the credit authorized under this section may qualify for the credit and, if so,
determines a taxpayer may qualify for the credit, shall notify such taxpayer of his or her
potential eligibility. In making a determination of eligibility under this section, the
department shall use any appropriate and available data including, but not limited to, data
available from the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Department of Treasury, and state
income tax returns from previous tax years.
5. The department shall prepare an annual report containing statistical information
regarding the tax credits issued under this section for the previous tax year, including the total
amount of revenue expended, the number of credits claimed, and the average value of the
credits issued to taxpayers whose earned income falls within various income ranges
determined by the department.
6. The director of the department may promulgate rules and regulations to administer
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective

HB 2616 3
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after January 1, 2023, shall be
invalid and void.
7. Tax credits authorized under this section shall not be subject to the requirements of
sections 135.800 to 135.830.
✔